Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 17.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1345.04
Transfer to Ethanol Production Incentive Cash Fund; legislative intent.

(1) The State Treasurer shall transfer from the General Fund to the Ethanol Production Incentive Cash Fund, on or before the end of each of fiscal years 1995-96 and 1996-97, $8,000,000 per fiscal year.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the following General Fund amounts be appropriated to the Ethanol Production Incentive Cash Fund in each of the following years:

(a) For each of fiscal years 1997-98 and 1998-99, $7,000,000 per fiscal year;

(b) For fiscal year 1999-2000, $6,000,000;

(c) For fiscal year 2000-01, $5,000,000;

(d) For fiscal year 2001-02 and for each of fiscal years 2003-04 through 2006-07, $1,500,000;

(e) For each of fiscal years 2005-06 and 2006-07, $2,500,000 in addition to the amount in subdivision (2)(d) of this section;

(f) For fiscal year 2007-08, $5,500,000;

(g) For each of fiscal years 2008-09 through 2011-12, $2,500,000;

(h) For each of fiscal years 2005-06 and 2006-07, $5,000,000 in addition to the other amounts in this section;

(i) For fiscal year 2007-08, $15,500,000 in addition to the other amounts in this section;

(j) For fiscal year 2009-10, $8,250,000 in addition to the other amounts in this section; and

(k) For fiscal year 2010-11, $3,000,000 in addition to the other amounts in this section.

Laws 1995, LB 377, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 605, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 536, § 6;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 90, § 19;

Laws 2006, LB 968, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB322, § 16;

Laws 2009, LB316, § 17.
May 20, 2009